North Carolina, session 2025, HB794.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The State Highway Patrol shall study and develop legislative
recommendations regarding each of the following State Highway Patrol items:
(1) The overall staffing size based on the needs of the State.
(2) The troop staffing size based on the needs of specific regions of the State.
(3) The overall salary scale of the Patrol.
(4) The salary scale of each rank within the Patrol.
SECTION 2. No later than March 1, 2026, the State Highway Patrol shall report to
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety, the House
Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety, and the Senate Appropriations
Committee on Justice and Public Safety regarding the findings and recommendations required
by Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H794-v-1*